New Jersey, session 221, A292.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a professional or occupational board designated in section 2 of P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-15) that issues a professional or occupational license, certificate of registration, or certification for which professional training, education, or experience is required shall issue the license, certificate of registration, or certification to an applicant with a license and equivalent training, education, and experience received while serving or after serving as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, regardless of whether the license, training, education, or experience was obtained during or outside the applicants service with the Armed Forces. b.    A professional or occupational board shall issue a license, certificate, or certification to an applicant who presents evidence to the board that: (1)   the applicant has been honorably discharged from active military service; and (2)   the applicants license, certificate, or certification is in good standing in another jurisdiction; and (3)   the applicant complies with all other requirements for licensure, including, without limitation, any requirement for examination. c.     A professional or occupational board may require an applicant to provide any documentation of the applicant's training, education, or experience as it deems necessary by the board to determine eligibility. d.    A professional or occupational board shall provide methods of evaluating equivalent training, education, or experience obtained towards meeting the requirements for the issuance of a license, certificate, or certification pursuant to this section; provided however that no method of evaluating experience from another jurisdiction shall operate in such a manner as to require the same number of hours of experience by the applicant. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following the date of enactment, except that a board may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance of that date as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.